tests/ky-verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Infinitive -{U}{U}":
    бол<v><iv><ger><nom> : болуу
    сүй<v><tv><ger><nom> : сүйүү
    окшо<v><iv><ger><nom> : окшоо
    иште<v><iv><ger><nom> : иштөө
    саба<v><tv><ger><nom> : сабоо
    аарчы<v><tv><ger><nom> : аарчуу
    ат<v><tv><ger><nom> : атуу

  "[lexc] Negative -б{A}":
    бол<v><iv><neg><prt_cond><p1><sg> : болбосом

  "[lexc] Conditional -с{A}":
    бол<v><iv><prt_cond><p1><sg> : болсом

  "[lexc] Perfect Converb -{I}п":
    иште<v><iv><prt_perf> : иштеп

  "[twol] Yotification":
    кой<v><tv><prt_perf> : коюп
